Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,116
Practicing without credential; operating business without credential; administrative penalty; procedure; disposition; attorney's fees and costs.

(1) The department may assess an administrative penalty of ten dollars per day for each day that evidence exists of practice prior to issuance, renewal after expiration, or reinstatement of a credential to practice a profession or operate a business. The total penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars.

(2) When the department assesses an administrative penalty, the department shall provide written notice of the assessment to the person. The notice shall be delivered in the manner prescribed by the department and shall include notice of the opportunity for a hearing.

(3) The department shall, within thirty days after receipt, remit an administrative penalty to the State Treasurer to be disposed of in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. An administrative penalty assessed and unpaid under this section shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in a proper form of action in the name of the state in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property. The department may also collect in such action attorney's fees and costs incurred directly in the collection of the administrative penalty.

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-164.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 116.